New Jersey, session 221, S4096.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    For the purposes of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Board means the Board of Public Utilities. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Smart meter means an electric metering device that employs smart meter technology to measure, record, and transmit electricity usage data to both a public utility and a customer for billing and other purposes.  Smart meter shall include a basic hourly interval meter, a meter with one-way communication, and a real-time meter with built-in, two-way communication capable of recording and transmitting instantaneous electricity usage data. 2.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an electric public utility shall not increase the rate charged to ratepayers after the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) for the purpose of recovering the cost of installing smart meters. 3.    a. On the date 30 days prior to, and until 30 days after, the effective date of any electric public utility rate increase, an electric public utility shall publish the following information on its Internet website and in any customer communication, including, but not limited to, a paper or electronic bill: (1)   the amount and effective date of the rate increase; (2)   the reasons for the rate increase; (3)   an explanation of any anticipated impact on ratepayer bills, including, but not limited to, a clear statement of the percentage by which ratepayer bills are expected to increase; and (4)   information on how ratepayers can provide feedback on the impact of or file a complaint concerning the rate increase. b.    If the board finds that an electric public utility violated subsection a. of this section, the board may impose a fine of up to $10,000 against the electric public utility. 4.    An electric public utility shall: a.     report to the federal Department of Energy any rate increase expected to result in an average increase of five percent or greater of ratepayer bills, no less than 60 days prior to the effective date of the rate increase.  Within its report to the Department of Energy, pursuant to this subsection, an electric public utility shall include the following information: (1)   the amount and effective date of the rate increase; (2)   the reasons for the rate increase; (3)   an explanation of any anticipated impact on ratepayer bills, including, but not limited to, a clear statement of the percentage by which ratepayer bills are expected to increase; and (4)   any measures the electric public utility may take to mitigate the rate increases impact on ratepayer bills; and b.    provide to the federal Department of Energy an annual report on: (1)   any trends in the duration, location, and cause of an electric public utilitys electric service interruptions, including, but not limited to, a summary of electric service interruptions during the preceding calendar year; and (2)   any trends in overdue bills from an electric public utilitys ratepayers during the preceding calendar year. 5.    Within six months following any rate increase resulting in an average increase of five percent or greater of ratepayer bills, an electric public utility shall not disconnect electric service to or assess a late fee for bill nonpayment to any ratepayer affected by that rate increase. 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.